California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(1) Within two years after the expiration of the license period during which the act or omission occurred. The provisions of this paragraph shall be applicable only if the license has not been inactivated, canceled, or revoked during the license period for which the bond was posted and accepted by the registrar as specified under Section 7071.7.

(2) If the license has been inactivated, canceled, or revoked, an action shall be brought within two years of the date the license of the active licensee would have expired had the license not been inactivated, canceled, or revoked. For the provisions of this paragraph to be applicable, the act or omission for which the action is filed must have occurred prior to the date the
 license was inactivated, canceled, or revoked.

(3) An action against a disciplinary bond filed by an active licensee pursuant to Section 7071.8 shall be brought in accordance with the provisions of paragraph (1) or (2), as applicable, or within two years after the last date for which a disciplinary bond filed pursuant to Section 7071.8 was required, whichever date is first.

(d) A claim to recover wages or fringe benefits shall be brought within six months from the date that the wage or fringe benefit delinquencies were discovered, but in no event shall a civil action thereon be brought later than two years from the date the wage or fringe benefit contributions were due.

(e) Whenever the surety makes payment on a claim against a bond required by this article, whether or not payment is made through a court action or
 otherwise, the surety shall, within 30 days of the payment, provide notice to the registrar. The notice required by this subdivision shall provide the following information by declaration on a form prescribed by the registrar:

(1) The name and license number of the contractor.

(2) The surety bond number.

(3) The amount of payment.

(4) The statutory basis upon which the claim is made.

(5) The names of the person or persons to whom payments have been made.

(6) Whether or not the payments were the result of a good faith action by the surety.

The notice shall also clearly indicate
 whether or not the licensee filed a protest in accordance with this section.

(f) Prior to the settlement of a claim through a good faith payment by the surety, a licensee shall have not less than 15 days in which to provide a written protest. This protest shall instruct the surety not to make payment from the bond on the licensee’s account upon the specific grounds that the claim is opposed by the licensee, and provide the surety a specific and reasonable basis for the licensee’s opposition to payment.

(1) Whenever a licensee files a protest in accordance with this subdivision, the board shall investigate the matter and file disciplinary action as set forth under this chapter if there is evidence that the surety has sustained a loss as the result of a good faith payment made for the purpose of mitigating any damages incurred by any person or entity covered under Section
 7071.5.

(2) A licensee that fails to file a protest as specified in this subdivision shall have 90 days from the date of notification by the board to submit proof of payment of the actual amount owed to the surety and, if applicable, proof of payment of any judgment or admitted claim in excess of the amount of the bond or, by operation of law, the license shall be suspended at the end of the 90 days. A license suspension pursuant to this subdivision shall be disclosed indefinitely as a failure to settle outstanding final liabilities in violation of this chapter. The disclosure specified by this subdivision shall also be applicable to all licenses covered by the provisions of subdivision (g).

(g) During any period in which a surety remains unreimbursed for a loss or expense sustained on a bond issued pursuant to this article, the license for which the bond was issued, and any other
 license on which any member of the licensee’s personnel of record has also been listed, may not be renewed, reissued, or reinstated while the licensee was subject to suspension or disciplinary action under this section.

(h) The licensee may provide the board with a notarized copy of an accord, reached with the surety to satisfy the debt in lieu of full payment. By operation of law, failure to abide by the accord shall result in the automatic suspension of a license to which this section applies. A license that is suspended for failure to abide by the accord may only be renewed or reinstated when proof of satisfaction of all debts is made.

(i) Legal fees may not be charged against the bond by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 698, Sec. 17.   (SB 392)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

7071.13.

Any reference by a contractor in his advertising, soliciting, or other presentments to the public to any bond required to be filed pursuant to this chapter is a ground for the suspension of the license of such contractor.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 7071.8 by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1604.)
-------------------------------------------

7071.14.

No licensee or applicant for a license under this chapter shall be denied a contractor’s license bond solely because of his race, religious creed, color, national origin, ancestry, or sex. Whoever denies a contractor’s license bond solely on the grounds specified herein is liable for each and every such offense for the actual damages, and two hundred fifty dollars ($250) in addition thereto, suffered by the licensee or applicant for a license.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 669.)
-------------------------------------------

7071.15.

If a licensee fails to maintain a sufficient bond required by this article, the license is subject to suspension or revocation pursuant to Section 996.020 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 18, Sec. 1.5.   Effective April 21, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

7071.17.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the board shall require, as a condition precedent to accepting an application for licensure, renewal, reinstatement, or to change officers or other personnel of record, that an applicant, previously found to have failed or refused to pay a contractor, subcontractor, consumer, materials supplier, or employee based on an unsatisfied final judgment, file or have on file with the board a bond sufficient to guarantee payment of an amount equal to the unsatisfied final judgment or judgments. The applicant shall have 90 days from the date of notification by the board to file the bond or the application shall become void and the applicant shall reapply for issuance, reinstatement, or reactivation of a license. The board may not issue, reinstate, or reactivate a license until the bond is
 filed with the board. The bond required by this section is in addition to the contractor’s bond. The bond shall be on file for a minimum of one year, after which the bond may be removed by submitting proof of satisfaction of all debts. The applicant may provide the board with a notarized copy of any accord, reached with any individual holding an unsatisfied final judgment, to satisfy a debt in lieu of filing the bond. The board shall include on the license application for issuance, reinstatement, or reactivation, a statement, to be made under penalty of perjury, as to whether there are any unsatisfied judgments against the applicant on behalf of contractors, subcontractors, consumers, materials suppliers, or the applicant’s employees. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, if it is found that the applicant falsified the statement then the license will be retroactively suspended to the date of issuance and the license will stay suspended until the bond, satisfaction of judgment, or notarized copy of any
 accord applicable under this section is filed.

(b) (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all licensees shall notify the registrar in writing of any unsatisfied final judgment imposed on the licensee. If the licensee fails to notify the registrar in writing within 90 days, the license shall be automatically suspended on the date that the registrar is informed, or is made aware of the unsatisfied final judgment.

(2) The suspension shall not be removed until proof of satisfaction of the judgment, or in lieu thereof, a notarized copy of an accord is submitted to the registrar.

(3) If the licensee notifies the registrar in writing within 90 days of the imposition of any unsatisfied final judgment, the licensee shall, as a condition to the continual maintenance of the license, file or have
 on file with the board a bond sufficient to guarantee payment of an amount equal to all unsatisfied judgments applicable under this section.

(4) The licensee has 90 days from the date of notification by the board to file the bond or at the end of the 90 days the license shall be automatically suspended. In lieu of filing the bond required by this section, the licensee may provide the board with a notarized copy of any accord reached with any individual holding an unsatisfied final judgment.

(c) By operation of law, failure to maintain the bond or failure to abide by the accord shall result in the automatic suspension of any license to which this section applies.

(d) A license that is suspended for failure to comply with the provisions of this section can only be reinstated when proof of satisfaction of all debts is
 made, or when a notarized copy of an accord has been filed as set forth under this section.

(e) This section applies only with respect to an unsatisfied final judgment that is substantially related to the construction activities of a licensee licensed under this chapter, or to the qualifications, functions, or duties of the license.

(f) Except as otherwise provided, this section does not apply to an applicant or licensee when the financial obligation covered by this section has been discharged in a bankruptcy proceeding.

(g) Except as otherwise provided, the bond shall remain in full force in the amount posted until the entire debt is satisfied. If, at the time of renewal, the licensee submits proof of partial satisfaction of the financial obligations covered by this section, the board may authorize the bond to be
 reduced to the amount of the unsatisfied portion of the outstanding judgment. When the licensee submits proof of satisfaction of all debts, the bond requirement may be removed.

(h) The board shall take the actions required by this section upon notification by any party having knowledge of the outstanding judgment upon a showing of proof of the judgment.

(i) For the purposes of this section, the term “judgment” also includes any final arbitration award where the time to file a petition for a trial de novo or a petition to vacate or correct the arbitration award has expired, and no petition is pending.

(j) (1) If a judgment is entered against a licensee or any personnel of record of a licensee, then a qualifying person or personnel of record of the licensee at the time of the activities on which
 the judgment is based shall be automatically prohibited from serving as a qualifying individual or other personnel of record on any license until the judgment is satisfied.

(2) The prohibition described in paragraph (1) shall cause the license of any other existing renewable licensed entity with any of the same personnel of record as the judgment debtor licensee or with any of the same judgment debtor personnel to be suspended until the license of the judgment debtor is reinstated, the judgment is satisfied, or until those same personnel of record disassociate themselves from the renewable licensed entity.

(k) For purposes of this section, lawful money or cashier’s check deposited pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 995.710 of the Code of Civil Procedure, may be submitted in lieu of the bond.

(l) Notwithstanding subdivision (f), the failure of a licensee to notify the registrar of an unsatisfied final judgment in accordance with this section is cause for disciplinary action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 370, Sec. 10.   (SB 1371)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

7071.18.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, a licensee shall report to the registrar in writing the occurrence of any of the following within 90 days after the licensee obtains knowledge of the event:

(1) The conviction of the licensee for any felony.

(2) The conviction of the licensee for any other crime that is substantially related to the qualifications, functions, and duties of a licensed contractor.

(b) (1) The board shall consult with licensees, consumers, and other interested stakeholders in order to prepare a study of judgments,
 arbitration awards, and settlements that were the result of claims for construction defects for rental residential units and, by January 1, 2018, shall report to the Legislature the results of this study to determine if the board’s ability to protect the public as described in Section 7000.6 would be enhanced by regulations requiring licensees to report judgments, arbitration awards, or settlement payments of those claims. Participation by licensees and consumers shall be voluntary. The study shall include, but not be limited to, criteria used by insurers or others to differentiate between settlements that are for nuisance value and those that are not, whether settlement information or other information can help identify licensees who may be subject to an enforcement action, if there is a way to separate subcontractors from general contractors when identifying licensees who may be subject to an
 enforcement
 action, whether reporting should be limited to settlements resulting from construction defects that resulted in death or injury, the practice of other boards within the department, and any other criteria considered reasonable by the board. The board shall submit the report to the Legislature in accordance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(2) Records or documents obtained by the board during the course of implementing this subdivision that are exempt from public disclosure under the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code) shall remain exempt from disclosure pursuant to that act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 24.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Sec. 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------

7071.19.

(a) As a condition of the issuance, reinstatement, reactivation, or continued valid use of a license under this chapter, in addition to any bond required under this article, a limited liability company shall, in accordance with this section, maintain a policy or policies of insurance against liability imposed on or against it by law for damages arising out of claims based upon acts, errors, or omissions arising out of the contracting services it provides.

(b) The total aggregate limit of liability under the policy or policies of insurance required under this section shall be as follows:

(1) For a limited liability company licensee
 with five or fewer persons listed on the members of the personnel of record, the aggregate limit shall not be less than one million dollars ($1,000,000).

(2) For a limited liability company licensee with more than five persons listed on the members of the personnel of record, an additional one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) of insurance shall be obtained for each person listed on the personnel of record of the licensee except that the maximum amount of insurance is not required to exceed five million dollars ($5,000,000) in any one designated period, less amounts paid in defending, settling, or discharging claims as set forth under this section.

(c) The policy or policies required by this section may be issued on a claims-made or occurrence basis, and shall cover: (1) in
 the case of a claims-made policy, claims initially asserted in the
 designated period, and (2) in the case of an occurrence policy, occurrences during the designated period. For purposes of this section, “designated period” means a policy year or any other period designated in the policy that is not greater than 12 months. Any policy or policies secured to satisfy the requirements of this section shall be written by an insurer or insurers duly licensed by this state or an eligible surplus line insurer, with the insurance procured pursuant to Section 1765.1 of the Insurance Code, and may be in a form reasonably
 available in the commercial insurance market and may be subject to those terms, conditions, exclusions, and endorsements that are typically contained in those policies. A policy or policies of insurance maintained pursuant to this section may be subject to a deductible or self-insured retention.

(d) The impairment or exhaustion of the aggregate limit of liability by amounts paid under any policy in connection with the settlement, discharge, or defense of claims applicable to a designated period shall not require the licensee to acquire additional insurance coverage for that designated period. However, the aggregate limit of liability coverage (coverage limit) required by this section shall be reinstated by not later than the commencement date of the next designated period, and the license of any licensee that fails to comply with this provision
 shall be suspended by operation of law until the date that the licensee complies with the coverage limit requirements of this section. In addition, the amount to which any coverage limit is depleted may be reported on the license record.

(e) Upon the dissolution and winding up of the company, the company shall, with respect to any insurance policy or policies then maintained pursuant to this section, maintain or obtain an extended reporting period endorsement or equivalent provision in the maximum total aggregate limit of liability required to comply with this section for a minimum of three years if reasonably available from the insurer.

(f) Prior to the issuance, reinstatement, or reactivation of a limited liability company license as provided under this chapter, the
 applicant or licensee shall, in the manner prescribed by the registrar, submit the information and documentation required by this section and requested by the registrar, demonstrating compliance with the financial security requirements specified by this section.

(g) For any insurance policy secured by a licensee in satisfaction of this section, a Certificate of Liability Insurance, signed by an authorized agent or employee of the insurer, shall be submitted electronically or otherwise to the registrar. The insurer issuing the certificate, or, in the case of a surplus line policy, the surplus line broker, shall report to the registrar the following information for any policy required under this section: name, license number, policy number, dates that
 coverage is scheduled to commence and lapse, the date and amount of any payment of claims, and cancellation date if applicable.

(h) Upon the issuance, reinstatement, or reactivation of a license under this section, the registrar may post the following information to the licensee’s license record on the Internet:

(1) The name of the insurer or insurers providing the liability policy or policies submitted by the licensee for the most recent designated period.

(2) Any policy numbers and the sum of the aggregate limit of liability provided by each.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 114, Sec. 1.   (AB 1236)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

7071.20.

(a) A licensee shall report to the registrar in writing within 90 days after the licensee has knowledge of any civil action resulting in a final judgment, executed settlement agreement, or final arbitration award in which the licensee is named as a defendant or cross-defendant, filed on or after January 1, 2019, that meets all of the following criteria:

(1) The action alleges fraud, deceit, negligence, breach of contract or express or implied warranty, misrepresentation, incompetence, recklessness, wrongful death, or strict liability by the act or omission of a licensee
 while acting in the capacity of a contractor, whether as a general contractor or as a specialty contractor.

(2) The amount or value of the judgment, settlement payment, or arbitration award for which the licensee is named as a defendant or cross-defendant, is one million dollars ($1,000,000) or greater, not including investigative costs or prior repairs performed by the licensee.

(3) The action is the result of a claim for damages to a property or person that allegedly resulted in a failure or condition that creates a substantial risk of a failure in the load bearing portions of a multifamily
 rental residential structure.

(4) The action is the result of a claim for damages to a property or person that was allegedly caused by a licensee’s construction,
 repair, alteration to, subtraction from, improvement of, moving, wrecking, or demolishing of, any part of a multifamily rental residential structure, either personally or by or through others. 

(5) The action, if a civil action, has been designated by a court of competent jurisdiction as a “complex case” pursuant to rules 3.400 to 3.403, inclusive, of the California Rules of Court because it involves a claim of construction defect or insurance coverage arising out of a construction defect claim, pursuant to paragraph (2) or (7) of subdivision (c) of Rule 3.400 of the California Rules of Court.

(b) This section shall not apply to residential construction subject to any part of Title 7 (commencing with Section 895) of Part 2 of Division 2 of the Civil Code.

(c) In an action that meets the criteria of this section, in which more than one contractor is named as a defendant or cross-defendant, all contractors who are apportioned any liability either by the court or pursuant to an agreement between parties, shall report the action pursuant to subdivision (a). This subdivision does not apply to a contractor who is named as a defendant or cross-defendant, but is assigned liability of less than fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) in the action. 

(d) The reports required by this section shall be
 signed by the licensee and shall set forth the license number of the licensee and the facts that constitute the reportable event. If the reportable event involves the action of a court, the report shall also set forth the following:

(1) The title of the matter.

(2) The court or agency name.

(3) The docket number.

(4) The claim or file number.

(5) The date on which the reportable event occurred.

(e) (1) The registrar or a designee shall review the reports required by this section. The registrar or designee shall return the report to the licensee and take no further action if, upon review, the registrar or a designee finds any of the following:

(A) The facts of the reportable event would not substantiate an allegation that a licensee has violated this chapter.

(B) There are reasonable grounds to believe that the public interest is sufficiently served by the existing resolution or disposition of the reportable event as reached by the parties to the action or by the court.

(C) Disciplinary action is unnecessary.

(2) Any report returned to a licensee pursuant to this subdivision shall be deemed to be a complaint resolved in favor of the licensee and the facts underlying the event as reported by the licensee shall not be subject to further review by the board, except upon receipt of an independent complaint involving the same underlying facts.

(3) If additional information is necessary to make the determination required by paragraph (1), the registrar or designee shall keep and regard the report as a complaint that shall be subject to Sections 7090 and 7091. The disclosure of any complaint referred to investigation pursuant to this section shall comply with the public disclosure provisions of Section 7124.6.

(f) Failure of a licensee to report to the registrar in the time and manner required by this section shall be grounds for disciplinary action. Criminal penalties shall not be imposed for a violation of this section.

(g) Except as provided in paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (e), nothing in this section is intended to limit the registrar’s authority on his or her motion, or upon the verified written complaint of another, to investigate the actions of a contractor as specified in Section 7090.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 514, Sec. 1.   (SB 1465)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

7071.21.

(a) An insurer providing a licensee commercial general liability insurance, construction defect insurance, or professional liability insurance shall report to the registrar within 30 days of all or a portion of the insurer’s payment of a civil action judgment, settlement payment, or arbitration award, that meets all of the requirements of Section 7071.20, against the licensee all of the following:

(1) The name and license number of the licensee.

(2) The claim or file number.

(3) The amount or value of the judgment, settlement payment, or
 arbitration award.

(4) The amount paid by the insurer.

(5) The identity of the payee.

(b) (1) The registrar or a designee shall review the reports required by this section. The registrar or designee shall return the
 report to the licensee and take no further action if, upon review, the registrar or a designee finds any of the following:

(A) The facts of the reportable event would not substantiate an allegation that a licensee has violated this chapter.

(B) There are reasonable grounds to believe that the public interest is sufficiently served by the existing resolution or disposition of the reportable event as reached by the parties to the action or by the court.

(C) Disciplinary action is unnecessary.

(2) Any report returned to a licensee pursuant to this subdivision shall be deemed to be a complaint resolved in favor of the licensee and the facts underlying the event
 as reported by the licensee shall not be subject to further review by the board, except upon receipt of an independent complaint involving the same underlying facts.

(3) If additional information is necessary to make the determination required by paragraph (1), the registrar or designee shall keep and regard the report as a complaint that shall be subject to Sections 7090 and 7091. The disclosure of any complaint referred to investigation pursuant to this section shall comply with the public disclosure provisions of Section 7124.6.

(c) Except as provided in paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (b), nothing in this section is intended to limit the registrar’s authority on his or her motion, or upon the verified written complaint of
 another, to investigate the actions of a contractor as specified in Section 7090.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 514, Sec. 2.   (SB 1465)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

7071.22.

(a) Sections 7071.20 and 7071.21 shall apply if a party to the civil action, judgment, settlement payment, or arbitration award is or was a licensee, as defined in Section 7096, or was a member of the personnel of the record, a person, or a qualifying person, as those terms are defined in Section 7025.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, a licensee or person providing a report to the registrar pursuant to Section 7071.20 or 7071.21 shall not be considered to have violated a confidential settlement agreement or other confidential agreement.

(c) The board may adopt regulations to further the purposes of Sections
 7071.20 and 7071.21, specifically with regard to the reporting requirements of those sections.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 514, Sec. 3.   (SB 1465)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

7072.

Following receipt of the application fee and an application furnishing complete information in the manner required by the registrar, and after such examination and investigation as he may require, the registrar, within 15 days after approval of the application, shall notify the applicant that a license may be issued to him on payment of the initial license fee provided in Article 8 (commencing at Section 7135), and, when the initial license fee is paid, shall issue a license to him permitting him to engage in business as a contractor under the terms of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1970, Ch. 340.)
-------------------------------------------

7072.5.

(a) Upon the issuance of a license, a plasticized pocket card of a size, design, and content as may be determined by the registrar shall be issued at no cost to each licensee, or to the partners, managers, officers, or responsible managing officers of licensees licensed as other than individuals, which card shall be evidence that the licensee is duly licensed pursuant to this chapter. All cards issued shall be surrendered upon the suspension, revocation, or denial of renewal of the license, and shall be mailed or delivered to the board within five days of the suspension, revocation, or denial.

(b) When a person to whom a card is issued terminates his or her position, office, or
 association with a licensee that is licensed as other than an individual, that person shall surrender his or her card to the licensee and within five days thereafter the card shall be mailed or delivered by the licensee to the board for cancellation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 698, Sec. 20.   (SB 392)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

7073.

(a) The registrar may deny any application for a license or supplemental classification where the applicant has failed to comply with any rule or regulation adopted pursuant to this chapter or where there are grounds for denial under Section 480. Procedures for denial of an application shall be conducted in accordance with Section 485.

(b) When the board has denied an application for a license on grounds that the applicant has committed a crime substantially related to qualifications, functions, or duties of a contractor, it shall, in its decision or in its notice under subdivision (b) of Section 485, inform the applicant of the earliest date on which the applicant may reapply for a license. The board shall develop criteria, similar to the criteria developed to evaluate rehabilitation, to establish the earliest date on which the applicant may reapply. The date set by the registrar shall not be more than five years from the effective date of the decision or service of notice under subdivision (b) of Section 485.

(c) The board shall inform an applicant that all competent evidence of rehabilitation shall be considered upon reapplication.

(d) Along with the decision or notice under subdivision (b) of Section 485, the board shall serve a copy of the criteria for rehabilitation formulated under Section 482.

(e) In lieu of denying licensure as authorized under this section, the registrar may issue an applicant a probationary license with terms and conditions. During the probationary period, if information is brought to the attention of the registrar regarding any act or omission of the licensee constituting grounds for discipline or denial of licensure for which the registrar determines that revocation of the probationary license would be proper, the registrar shall notify the applicant to show cause within 30 days why the probationary license should not be revoked. The proceedings shall be conducted in accordance with the provisions of Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and the registrar shall have all the powers granted therein. A probationary license shall not be renewed during any period in which any proceeding brought pursuant to this section is pending.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 280, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

7074.

(a) Except as otherwise provided by this section, an application for an original license, for an additional classification, or for a change of qualifier shall become void when:

(1) The applicant or the examinee for the applicant has failed to achieve a passing grade in the qualifying examination within 18 months after the application has been deemed acceptable by the board.

(2) The applicant for an original license, after having been notified to do so, fails to pay the initial license fee within 90 days from the date of the notice.

(3) The applicant, after having been notified to do so, fails to file within 90 days from the date of the
 notice any bond or lawful money or cashier’s check deposited pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 995.710 of the Code of Civil Procedure or other documents that may be required for issuance or granting pursuant to this chapter.

(4) After filing, the applicant withdraws the application.

(5) The applicant fails to return the application rejected by the board for insufficiency or incompleteness within 90 days from the date of original notice or rejection.

(6) The application is denied after disciplinary proceedings conducted in accordance with the provisions of this code.

(b) The void date on an application may be extended up to 90 days or one examination may be rescheduled without a fee upon documented evidence by the applicant that the
 failure to complete the application process or to appear for an examination was due to a medical emergency or other circumstance beyond the control of the applicant.

(c) An application voided pursuant to this section shall remain in the possession of the registrar for the period as he or she deems necessary and shall not be returned to the applicant. Any reapplication for a license shall be accompanied by the fee fixed by this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 925, Sec. 4.   (AB 3126)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

7075.

The license shall be displayed in the licensee’s main office or chief place of business. Satisfactory evidence of the possession of a license and the current renewal thereof shall be provided by the licensee upon demand.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1326, Sec. 4.   Effective September 26, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

7075.1.

(a) No license, regardless of type or classification, shall be transferable to any other person or entity under any circumstances.

(b) A license number may be reissued after cancellation, revocation, suspension, or expiration beyond the renewal period specified in Section 7141, only under the following circumstances:

(1) To an individual upon application.

(2) To a partnership upon application if there is no change in the partners or partnership structure.

(3) To a corporation upon application if there is no
 change in the status of the corporation as registered with the Secretary of State.

(4) To a limited liability company upon application if there is no change in the status of the company as registered with the Secretary of State.

(c) A license number may be reissued or reassigned to a different entity only under the following conditions:

(1) To a corporation when the parent corporation has merged or created a subsidiary, the subsidiary has merged into the parent corporation, or the corporation has changed its filing status with the Secretary of State from a domestic corporation to a foreign corporation or from a foreign corporation to a domestic corporation, and the new entity is being formed to continue the
 business of the formerly licensed corporation.

(2) To a limited liability company when the parent limited
 liability company has merged or created a subsidiary, the subsidiary has merged into the parent limited liability company, or the limited liability company has changed its filing status with the Secretary of State from a domestic limited liability company to a foreign limited liability company or from a foreign limited liability company to a domestic limited liability company, and the new entity is being formed to continue the business of the formerly licensed limited liability company.

(3) To an individual when the individual is an immediate family member of a licensed individual who is deceased or absent and the license is required to continue an existing family contracting business.

(4) To a corporation or limited liability company when created by
 immediate members of an individual licensee’s family to continue an existing deceased or absent individual licensee’s contracting business.

(5) To a corporation or limited liability company when the corporation or limited liability company is formed by an individual licensee and the individual licensee maintains ownership directly or indirectly of shares or membership interests evidencing more than 50 percent of the voting power.

(6) To a limited liability company that is formed by a corporation to continue the business of the corporation subsequent to the cancellation of the corporate entity’s license, provided the personnel listed for each entity are the same.

(d) For purposes of this section, an immediate family member of
 a deceased or absent licensed individual is either a spouse, father, mother, brother, sister, son, daughter, stepson, stepdaughter, grandson, granddaughter, son-in-law, or daughter-in-law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 573, Sec. 29.   (SB 800)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

7076.

(a) An individual license shall be canceled upon the death of a person licensed as an individual. An immediate member of the family of the deceased licensee may request a continuance of the license to complete projects in progress and undertake new work for a reasonable amount of time to be determined by rules of the board. The request for a continuance must be made in writing and received at the board’s headquarters office within 90 days after the death. Approval of the continuance of an individual license may be contingent upon meeting the bond requirements of Sections 7071.5 and 7071.6 within 90 days of notification by the board of that requirement. The immediate member of the family must apply for and obtain his or her own license to continue contracting after the continuance expires.

(b) A partnership license shall be canceled upon the death of a general partner. The remaining partner or partners shall notify the registrar in writing within 90 days of the death of a general partner. Failure to notify the registrar within 90 days of the death is grounds for disciplinary action.

The remaining general partner or partners may request a continuance of the license to complete projects in progress and undertake new work for a reasonable amount of time to be determined by rules of the board. The request for a continuance must be made in writing and received at the board’s headquarters office within 90 days after the death. The remaining general partner or partners must apply for and obtain a new license to continue contracting after the continuance expires.

(c) A partnership license shall be canceled upon the disassociation of a